North Carolina statutes. Chapter 139. Soil and Water Conservation Districts.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 139-8.
Powers of districts and supervisors.

A soil and water conservation district organized under the provisions of this Article shall constitute a governmental subdivision of this State, and a public body corporate and politic, exercising public powers, and such district, and the supervisors thereof, shall have the following powers in addition to others granted in other sections of this Chapter:

To conduct surveys and investigations relating to the character of soil erosion and floodwater and sediment damages, and to the conservation, utilization, and disposal of water, the development of water resources, and the preventive and control measures and works of improvement needed, to publish the results of such surveys and investigations, and to disseminate information concerning such preventive and control measures and works of improvement.

To carry out preventive and control measures and works of improvement for flood prevention or the conservation, utilization, and disposal of water and development of water resources within the district, including, but not limited to, engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, changes in use of land, and the measures listed in subsection (a), subdivision (3) of

G.S. 139-2

, on lands owned or controlled by this State or any of its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on any other lands within the district upon obtaining the consent of the occupiers of such lands or the necessary rights or interest in such lands.

To cooperate, or enter into agreements with, and within the limits or appropriations duly made available to it by law, to furnish financial or other aid to, any agency, governmental or otherwise, or any occupiers of land within the district, in the carrying on of erosion control and prevention operations and works of improvement for flood prevention or the conservation, utilization, and disposal of water and development of water resources within the district, subject to such conditions as the supervisors may deem necessary to advance the purposes of this Chapter.

To obtain options upon and to acquire by purchase, exchange, lease, gift, grant, devise, or otherwise, any property, real or personal, or rights or interests therein; to maintain, administer, and improve any properties acquired, to receive income from such properties and to expend such income in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this Chapter; and to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of its property or interests therein in furtherance of the purposes and the provisions of this Chapter.

To make available, on such terms as it shall prescribe, to land occupiers within the district, agricultural and engineering machinery and equipment, fertilizer, seeds and seedlings, and such other material or equipment as will assist such land occupiers to carry on operations upon their lands for the conservation of soil resources and for the prevention and control of soil erosion and for flood prevention or the conservation, development, utilization, and disposal of water and the development of water resources.

To construct, improve, operate, and maintain such structures, works and projects as may be necessary or convenient for the performance of any of the operations authorized in this Chapter, including watershed improvement structures, works, and projects as well as any other structures, works, and projects which the district is authorized to undertake.

To develop comprehensive plans for the conservation of soil resources and for the control and prevention of soil erosion and for flood prevention or the conservation, utilization and disposal of water and development of water resources, within the district, which plans shall specify in such detail as may be possible, the acts, procedures, performances, and avoidances which are necessary or desirable for the effectuation of such plans, including the specification of engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, cropping programs, tillage practices, and changes in use of land; and to bring such plans and information to the attention of occupiers of lands within the district.

To act as agent for the United States, or any of its agencies, in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, or administration of any project for soil conservation, erosion control, erosion prevention, flood prevention, or for the conservation, utilization, and disposal of water and development of water resources, or combinations thereof, within its boundaries; to accept donations, gifts, and contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise, from the United States or any of its agencies, or from this State or any of its agencies, and to use or expend such moneys, services, materials, or other contributions in carrying on its operations, except that all forest tree seedlings shall be obtained insofar as available from the Department of Environmental Quality in cooperation with the United States Department of Agriculture.

To sue and be sued in the name of the district; to have a seal, which seal shall be judicially noticed; to have perpetual succession unless terminated as hereinafter provided; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers; to make, and from time to time amend and repeal, rules and regulations not inconsistent with this Chapter, to carry into effect its purposes and powers.

As a condition to the extending of any benefits under this Chapter to, or the performance of work upon, any lands not owned or controlled by this State or any of its agencies, the supervisors may require contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise to any operations conferring such benefits, and may require land occupiers to enter into and perform such agreement or covenants as to the permanent use of such lands as will tend to prevent or control erosion and prevent floodwater and sediment damages therein.

No provision with respect to the acquisition, operation, or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to a district organized hereunder unless the legislature shall specifically so state.

Nothing contained in this Chapter shall authorize or allow the withdrawal of water from a watershed or stream except to the extent and degree now permissible under the existing common and statute law of this State; nor to change or modify such existing common or statute law with respect to the relative rights of riparian owners or others concerning the use or disposal of water in the streams of this State; nor to authorize a district, its officers or governing body or any other person, firm, corporation (public or private), body politic or governmental agency to utilize or dispose of water except in the manner and to the extent permitted by the existing common and statute law of this State.

To assist the Commission in the implementation and supervision of the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control created pursuant to

G.S. 106-850

and to assist in the implementation and supervision of any other program intended to protect water quality or quantity administered by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services by providing technical assistance, allocating available grant monies, and providing any other assistance that may be required or authorized by any provision of federal or State law.

A district supervisor or an organization or unit of local government of which the supervisor is an employee, officer, or elected member of the governing body may apply for and receive a grant under the Agriculture Cost Share Program for Nonpoint Source Pollution Control created pursuant to Article 72 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes, the Community Conservation Assistance Program created pursuant to Article 73 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes, the Agricultural Water Resources Assistance Program created pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter, or the Streamflow Rehabilitation Assistance Program created pursuant to Article 6 of this Chapter if:

The district supervisor does not vote on the application or attempt to influence the outcome of any action on the application; and

The application is approved by the Commission.

History.

1937, c. 398, s. 8; 1939, c. 341; 1959, c. 781, s. 7; 1969, c. 711, s. 1; 1973, c. 1262, s. 38; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(93); 1995, c. 519, ss. 2, 3; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2006-78, s. 4; 2011-145, ss. 13.22A(n), (dd), 13.23(e); 2011-284, s. 91; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2021-180, s. 5.9(o).

Local Modification.

Duplin (As to subdivision (6)): 1969, c. 286; Johnston: 1969, c. 955; New Hanover: 1969, c. 958; Pender and Sampson (as to subdivision (6)): 1969, c. 286; Wayne: 1969, c. 821.

Editor’s Note.

At the direction of the Revisor of Statutes, in subsection (b), “Article 72 of Chapter 106” was substituted for “Part 9 of Article 21 of Chapter 143” and “Article 73 of Chapter 106” was substituted for “Part 11 of Article 21 of Chapter 143” to conform to the recodification of Part 9 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 as Article 72 of Chapter 106 and Part 11 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 as Article 73 of Chapter 106 by Session Laws
2011-145, s. 13.22A(t) and (x).

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-78, s. 4, effective July 10, 2006, added “created pursuant to Part 9 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes or the Community Conservation Assistance Program created pursuant to Part 11 of Article 21 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(n), effective July 1, 2011, in subdivision (a)(13), substituted “G.S. 106-850” for “G.S. 143-215.74,” inserted “or quantity” following “water quality,” substituted “Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources,” and made a minor stylistic change.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.23(e), effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory paragraph of subsection (b), inserted “or the Agricultural Water Resources Assistance Program created pursuant to Article 5 of this Chapter” and made a minor stylistic change.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 91, effective June 24, 2011, deleted “bequest” following “grant” in subdivision (a)(4).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subdivision (a)(8).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 5.9(o), effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (b), inserted “or an organization or unit of local government of which the supervisor is an employee, officer, or elected member of the governing body,” added “or the Streamflow Rehabilitation Assistance Program created pursuant to Article 6 of this Chapter,” and made a related change, and redesignated former subdivisions (b)1. and 2. as present subdivisions (b)(1) and (2).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

As to disposition or exchange of land by watershed improvement district,

see opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Samuel H. Johnson, Watershed Improvement Commission, 41 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 228 (1971).

§ 139-8.1.
Purposes of Chapter.

It is hereby declared that the provisions of General Statutes Chapter 139 were intended to authorize the maintenance of watershed improvement works and projects, as well as watershed improvement structures. All expenditures heretofore incurred by any local watershed sponsor for any such maintenance of works, projects, or structures are hereby validated and confirmed.

The proceeds of any tax heretofore approved by the voters of a county for a county watershed improvement program, or authorized by special or local act for a county watershed improvement program, may be expended for such maintenance of works and projects, as well as structures, if the board of county commissioners or other watershed governing body after a public hearing determines that the proceeds should be so expended. Notice of such hearing shall be published as provided for notices under Article 2 of General Statutes Chapter 139.

The proceeds of any tax hereafter approved by the voters of a county for a watershed improvement program may be expended for such maintenance of works and projects, as well as structures, with or without the holding of a public hearing as designated by subsection (b) of this section, even though any election procedures preliminary to the vote approving the tax may have been initiated prior to the ratification of this section.

No action based on the alleged invalidity of the expenditures herein confirmed or of the use of tax proceeds herein authorized shall lie after January 1, 1970, to enjoin or contest any such expenditure or any such use of tax proceeds.

History.

1969, c. 711, s. 1.

§ 139-8.2.
Certain information confidential.

All information that is collected by soil and water conservation districts from farm owners, animal owners, agricultural producers or owners of agricultural land that is confidential under federal or State law shall be held confidential by the soil and water conservation districts, including:

Information provided by an agricultural producer or owner of agricultural land concerning the agricultural operation, farming or conservation practices, or the land itself, in order to participate in soil and water conservation programs.

Geospatial information otherwise maintained by the district about agricultural lands or operations for which information described in subdivision (1) of this subsection is provided.

This section shall not include applications for cost-share assistance and associated contract documents that require the approval of the soil and water conservation district or the Soil and Water Conservation Commission.

History.

2020-18, s. 10(a).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2020-18, s. 10(b), made this section effective October 1, 2020.

Session Laws 2020-18, s. 16(a), is a severability clause.

§ 139-9.
Adoption of land-use regulations.

The supervisors of any district shall have authority to formulate regulations governing the use of lands within the district in the interest of conserving the soil and soil resources and preventing and controlling soil erosion. The supervisors may conduct such public meetings and public hearings upon tentative regulations as may be necessary to assist them in this work. The supervisors shall not have authority to enact such land-use regulations into law until after they shall have caused due notice to be given of their intention to conduct a referendum for submission of such regulations to the occupiers of lands lying within the boundaries of the district for their indication of approval or disapproval of such proposed regulations, and until after the supervisors have considered the result of such referendum. The proposed regulations shall be embodied in a proposed ordinance. Copies of such proposed ordinance shall be available for the inspection of all eligible voters during the period between publication of such notice and the date of the referendum. The notices of the referendum shall recite the contents of such proposed ordinance, or shall state where copies of such proposed ordinance may be examined. The question shall be submitted by ballots, upon which the words “For approval of proposed ordinance number
_______________ , prescribing land-use regulations for conservation of soil and prevention of erosion” and “Against approval of proposed ordinance number
_______________ , prescribing land-use regulations for conservation of soil and prevention of erosion” shall appear, with a square before each proposition and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before one or the other of said propositions as the voter may favor or oppose approval of such proposed ordinance. The supervisors shall supervise such referendum, shall prescribe appropriate regulations, governing the conduct thereof, and shall publish the result thereof. All occupiers of lands within the district shall be eligible to vote in such referendum. Only such land occupiers shall be eligible to vote. No informalities in the conduct of such referendum or in any matters relating thereto shall invalidate said referendum or the result thereof if notice thereof shall have been given substantially as herein provided and said referendum shall have been fairly conducted.

The supervisors shall not have authority to enact such proposed ordinance into law unless at least two thirds of the votes cast in such referendum shall have been cast for approval of the said proposed ordinance. The approval of the proposed ordinance by a two thirds of the votes cast in such referendum shall not be deemed to require the supervisors to enact such proposed ordinance into law. Land-use regulations prescribed in ordinances adopted pursuant to the provisions of this section by the supervisors of any district shall have the force and effect of law in the said district and shall be binding and obligatory upon all occupiers of lands within such district.

Any occupier of land within such district may at any time file a petition with the supervisors asking that any or all of land-use regulations prescribed in any ordinance adopted by the supervisors under the provisions of this section shall be amended, supplemented, or repealed. Land-use regulations prescribed in any ordinance adopted pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be amended, supplemented, or repealed except in accordance with the procedure prescribed in this section for adoption of land-use regulations. Referenda on adoption, amendment, supplementation, or repeal of land-use regulations shall not be held more often than once in six months.

The regulations to be adopted by the supervisors under the provisions of this section may include:

Provisions requiring the carrying out of necessary engineering operations, including the construction of terraces, terrace outlets, check dams, dikes, ponds, ditches, and other necessary structures.

Provisions requiring observance of particular methods of cultivation including contour cultivating, contour furrowing, lister furrowing, sowing, planting, strip cropping, seeding, and planting of lands to water-conserving and erosion-preventing plants, trees and grasses, forestation, and reforestation.

Specifications of cropping programs and tillage practices to be observed.

Provisions requiring the retirement from cultivation of highly erosive areas or of areas on which erosion may not be adequately controlled if cultivation is carried on.

Provisions for such other means, measures, operations, and programs as may assist conservation of soil resources and prevent or control soil erosion in the district, having due regard to the legislative findings set forth in

G.S. 139-2

.

The regulations shall be uniform, throughout the territory comprised within the district except that the supervisors may classify the lands within the district with reference to such factors as soil type, degree of slope, degree of erosion threatened or existing, cropping and tillage practices in use, and other relevant factors, and may provide regulations varying with the type or class of land affected, but uniform as to all lands within each class or type. Copies of land-use regulations adopted under the provisions of this section shall be printed and made available to all occupiers of lands lying within the district.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 9.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Role of States in Liberalizing Land Use Regulations,” see 97 N.C.L. Rev. 293 (2019).

§ 139-10.
Enforcement of land-use regulations.

The supervisors shall have authority to go upon any lands within the district to determine whether land-use regulations adopted under the provisions of

G.S. 139-9

are being observed. The supervisors are further authorized to provide by ordinance that any land occupier who shall sustain damages from any violation of such regulations by any other land occupier may recover damages at law from such other land occupier for such violation.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 10.

§ 139-11.
Nonobservance of prescribed regulations; performance of work under the regulations by the supervisors.

Where the supervisors of any district shall find that any of the provisions of land-use regulations prescribed in an ordinance adopted in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 139-9

are not being observed on particular lands, and that such nonobservance tends to increase erosion on such lands and its interfering with the prevention of control of erosion on other lands within the district, the supervisors may present to the superior court for the county or counties within which the lands of the defendant lie a petition, duly verified, setting forth the adoption of the ordinance prescribing land-use regulations, the failure of the defendant land occupier to observe such regulations, and to perform particular work, operations, or avoidances as required thereby, and that such nonobservance tends to increase erosion on such lands and is interfering with the prevention or control of erosion on other lands within the district, and praying the court to require the defendant to perform the work, operations, or avoidances within a reasonable time and to order that if the defendant shall fail so to perform, the supervisors may go on the land, perform the work or other operations or otherwise bring the condition of such lands into conformity with the requirements of such regulations, and recover the cost and expenses thereof, with interest, from the occupier of such land. Upon the presentation of such petition, the court shall cause process to be issued against the defendant, and shall hear the case. If it appear to the court that testimony is necessary for the proper disposition of the matter, it may take evidence, or appoint a referee to take such evidence as it may direct and report the same to the court with his findings of fact and conclusions of law, which shall constitute a part of the proceedings upon which the determination of the court shall be made. The court may dismiss the petition, or it may require the defendant to perform the work, operations, or avoidances, and may provide that upon the failure of the defendant to initiate such performance within the time specified in the order of the court, and to prosecute the same to completion with reasonable diligence, the supervisors may enter upon the lands involved and perform the work or operations or otherwise bring the condition of such lands into conformity with the requirements of the regulations and recover the costs and expenses thereof, with interest at the rate of five per centum (5%) per annum, from the occupier of such lands.

The court shall retain jurisdiction of the case until after the work has been completed. Upon completion of such work pursuant to such order of the court the supervisors may file a petition with the court, a copy of which shall be served upon the defendant in the case, stating the costs and expenses sustained by them in the performance of the work and praying judgment therefor with interest. The court shall have jurisdiction to enter judgment for the amount of such costs and expenses, with interest at the rate of five per centum (5%) per annum until paid, together with the costs of suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee to be fixed by the court. This judgment, when filed in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 1-234

, shall constitute a lien upon such lands.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 11.

§ 139-12.
Cooperation between districts.

The supervisors of any two or more districts organized under the provisions of this Chapter may cooperate with one another in the exercise of any or all powers conferred in this Chapter.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 12.

§ 139-13.
Discontinuance of districts.

At any time after five years after the organization of a district under the provisions of this Chapter, any 25 occupiers of land lying within the boundaries of such districts may file a petition with the Soil and Water Conservation Commission praying that the operations of the district be terminated and the existence of the district discontinued. The Commission may conduct such public meetings and public hearings upon such petition as may be necessary to assist it in the consideration thereof. Within 60 days after such a petition has been received by the Commission it shall give due notice of the holding of a referendum, and shall supervise such referendum, and issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct thereof, the question to be submitted by ballots upon which the words “For terminating the existence of the (name of the soil and water conservation district to be here inserted)” and “Against terminating the existence of the (name of the soil and water conservation district to be here inserted)” shall appear with a square before each proposition and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before one or the other of said propositions as the voter may favor or oppose discontinuance of such district. All occupiers of lands lying within the boundaries of the district shall be eligible to vote in such referendum. Only such land occupiers shall be eligible to vote. No informalities in the conduct of such referendum or in any matters relating thereto shall invalidate said referendum or the result thereof if notice thereof shall have been given substantially as herein provided and said referendum shall have been fairly conducted.

Click to view

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall publish the result of such referendum and shall thereafter consider and determine whether the continued operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. If the Commission shall determine that the continued operation of such district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and deny the petition. If the Commission shall determine that the continued operation of such district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and shall certify such determination to the supervisors of the district. In making such determination the Commission shall give due regard and weight to the attitudes of the occupiers of lands lying within the district, the number of land occupiers eligible to vote in such referendum who shall have voted, the proportion of the votes cast in such referendum in favor of the discontinuance of the district to the total number of votes cast, the approximate wealth and income of the land occupiers of the district, the probable expense of carrying on erosion control operations within such district, and such other economic and social factors as may be relevant to such determination, having due regard to the legislative findings set forth in

G.S. 139-2

: Provided, however, that the Commission shall not have authority to determine that the continued operation of the district is administratively practicable and feasible unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the referendum shall have been cast in favor of the continuance of such district.

Upon receipt from the Soil and Water Conservation Commission of a certification that the Commission has determined that the continued operation of the district is not administratively practicable and feasible, pursuant to the provisions of this section, the supervisors shall forthwith proceed to terminate the affairs of the district. The supervisors shall dispose of all property belonging to the district at public auction and shall pay over the proceeds of such sale to be covered into the State treasury. The supervisors shall thereupon file an application, duly verified, with the Secretary of State for the discontinuance of such district, and shall transmit with such application the certificates of the Soil and Water Conservation Commission setting forth the determination of the Commission that the continued operation of such district is not administratively practicable and feasible. The application shall recite that the property of the district has been disposed of and the proceeds paid over as in this section provided, and shall set forth a full accounting of such properties and proceeds of the sale. The Secretary of State shall issue to the supervisors a certificate of dissolution and shall record such certificate in an appropriate book of record in his office.

Upon issuance of a certificate of dissolution under the provisions of this section, all ordinances and regulations theretofore adopted and in force within such districts shall be of no further force and effect. All contracts theretofore entered into, to which the district or supervisors are parties, shall remain in force and effect for the period provided in such contracts. The Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall be substituted for the district or supervisors as party to such contracts. The Commission shall be entitled to all benefits and subject to all liabilities under such contracts and shall have the same right and liability to perform, to require performance, to sue and be sued thereon, and to modify or terminate such contracts by mutual consent or otherwise as the supervisors of the district would have had. Such dissolution shall not affect the lien of any judgment entered under the provisions of

G.S. 139-11

, nor the pendency of any action instituted under the provisions of such section, and the Commission shall succeed to all the rights and obligations of the district or supervisors as to such liens and actions.

The Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall not entertain petitions for the discontinuance of any district nor conduct referenda upon such petitions, nor make determinations pursuant to such petitions, in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter, more often than once in five years.

History.

1937, c. 393, s. 13; 1973, c. 1262, s. 38; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(94); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2011-145, s. 13.22A(o).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.22A(o), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in the first sentence of the second paragraph.

§ 139-14.
Dividing large districts.

Whenever the Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall receive a petition from any board of district supervisors signed by all supervisors of such district, the Commission shall have the authority to divide such district into two or more districts. The governing bodies of the resulting districts shall be composed of supervisors in the same manner and in the same number as is provided in

G.S. 139-6

and 139-7. Upon the creating of new districts through dividing an existing district under the provisions of this section, the Commission shall appoint all district supervisors necessary to give such district its full quota of supervisors who shall serve until regular supervisors are elected or appointed, as the case may be, at the time of the next regular election of supervisors. The Commission shall assign a name to each district resulting from the division of the district under the provisions of this section and do all other things necessary to complete the organization of such new districts and place them on an operating basis.

History.

1947, c. 131, s. 8; 1973, c. 1262, s. 38.

§ 139-15.
“County committeeman” construed to mean “county supervisor”; powers and duties.

Wherever the words “county committeeman” or “county committeemen” appear in this Chapter, the same shall be construed to mean “county supervisor” or “county supervisors”; and each such county committeeman or county supervisor shall receive the same compensation and have and exercise the same rights, powers, duties, responsibilities and voting privileges granted to or imposed upon district supervisors in respect to soil conservation activities under the provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1949, c. 268, s. 2.